Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.120

LEAP administrator and other assistants—Employment—Duties of LEAP administrator.

The committee is hereby authorized and empowered to appoint an officer to be known as the LEAP administrator who shall be the executive officer of the committee and assist in its duties and shall compile information for the committee.

Subject to RCW 44.04.260, the committee is hereby authorized and empowered to select and employ temporary and permanent personnel and fix their salaries.

The duties of the administrator shall be as follows:

(1) To manage the LEAP operations.

(2) To assist the several standing committees of the house and senate; to appear before other legislative committees; and to assist any other legislative committee upon instruction by the committee.

(3) To provide the legislature with information obtained under the direction of the committee.

(4) To maintain a record of all work performed by the administrator under the direction of the committee and to keep and make available all documents, data, and reports submitted to the administrator by any legislative committee.

[ 2001 c 259 s 15; 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 12.]